Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that Washington state faces an acute shortage of housing affordable to households at all income levels, resulting in housing insecurity and a growing number of people experiencing homelessness. The legislature further finds that local regulatory barriers, inconsistent siting standards, and discretionary review processes have constrained the timely development of permanent supportive housing, transitional housing, indoor emergency housing, and indoor emergency shelters. It is the intent of the legislature to increase housing supply and advance fair housing by requiring these housing types to be permitted in urban areas on the same terms as other types of lodging and residential development, subject only to objective and nondiscriminatory development standards necessary to protect public health and safety. By streamlining permitting processes and ensuring consistent treatment across jurisdictions, the legislature intends to avoid unnecessary cost increases associated with delays and to facilitate the prompt delivery of safe, dignified, and stable housing and to support statewide efforts to address homelessness and the housing crisis.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) A county or city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 must allow:(i) Transitional housing or permanent supportive housing in any zones within an urban growth area in which residential dwelling units or hotels are allowed; and(ii) Indoor emergency shelters and indoor emergency housing in any zones within an urban growth area in which hotels are allowed. Nothing in this subsection allows a county or city to limit indoor emergency shelters and indoor emergency housing in a manner where the capacity of indoor emergency shelters and indoor emergency housing is insufficient to meet the projected needs identified under RCW 36.70A.070(2)(a)(ii). A county or city must allow indoor emergency shelters and indoor emergency housing in additional types of zones when necessary to meet projected needs identified in RCW 36.70A.070(2)(a)(ii).(b) A county or city may not require transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, indoor emergency housing, and indoor emergency shelters to be located in a zone within an urban growth area zoned for industrial use.(2) Except as provided in subsections (5) through (7) of this section, a county or city may not require through development regulations, ordinances, or legal agreements any standards, conditions, or requirements for transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, indoor emergency housing, and indoor emergency shelters that are more restrictive than those required for other types of lodging or residential development within the same zone, but may apply any objective development regulations, including form-based codes, that are required for lodging or residential development including, but not limited to, density limits, dimensional standards, height restrictions, floor area ratio, setback, lot coverage, stormwater, clearing, and tree canopy and retention requirements.(3) Except as provided in subsections (5) through (7) of this section, a county or city shall only apply the same development permit and environmental review processes to transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, indoor emergency shelters, and indoor emergency housing that apply to other types of lodging or residential development within the same zone, unless otherwise required by state law including, but not limited to, shoreline regulations under chapter 90.58 RCW, building codes under chapter 19.27 RCW, energy codes under chapter 19.27A RCW, or electrical codes under chapter 19.28 RCW.(4) If applying design review for transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, indoor emergency shelters, and indoor emergency housing, only administrative design review may be required.(5)(a) For an indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing, a county or city may require the sponsor or managing agency to certify in writing that it has, between the date the permit application was approved and the date the certificate of occupancy was issued:(i) Provided the name, if any, of the facility and the name and headquarters address of the managing entity;(ii) Provided a description of any other programs operating in the building and copies of the applicable licenses and certifications held by the program;(iii) Notified residents within 500 feet of the indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing;(iv) Conducted more than one community meeting;(v) Designated at least one point of contact authorized to make decisions and take corrective action in the case of an emergency, and provided at least one telephone number to be used in emergencies; and(vi) Provided documentation of the sponsor's or managing agency's operational policies or procedures for:(A) Promoting and addressing health and safety inside the building and in areas immediately adjacent to the building;(B) Admissions, including a description of the populations the project will serve and potential sources of referral;(C) Program exit or transfer;(D) Handling complaints and grievances from occupants;(E) Health, fire, safety, and occupancy; and(F) Staffing to provide services and resources to the population being served comparable to standard or customary practices for the particular type of housing being provided. The staffing policy or procedure may include, but is not limited to, the number of staff or volunteers present during daytime and nighttime operations, staff or volunteer training, and other processes to provide services and resources to the populations being served.(b) The written certification by the sponsor or managing entity constitutes full compliance with (a) of this subsection. A county or city may not require the sponsor or managing agency to provide additional certifications outside of what is allowed under (a) of this subsection (5) or to repeat or revise any of the items in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection (5). Nothing in this subsection (b) prohibits the sponsor or managing agency from voluntarily updating any of the information submitted under (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection (5).(6) Nothing in this section requires a city or county to approve a permit application for permanent supportive housing, transitional housing, indoor emergency housing, or indoor emergency shelters that are proposed in a critical area in which no lodging or residential development is permitted, an area of natural hazards that generally prohibit lodging or residential development, or on agricultural, forest, or mineral lands of long-term commercial significance.(7)(a) Upon receipt of a permit application for an indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing with a proposed location within 500 feet of walking distance from another indoor emergency shelter or other indoor emergency housing, or within 500 feet of walking distance from the physical grounds of a public school as defined in RCW 28A.150.010 or a private school approved by the board of education under chapter 28A.195 RCW that existed before an indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing is in operation or has submitted a permit application, the city in which the indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing is proposed, or the county if the indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing is not proposed in a city, may enter into good faith negotiations with the sponsor of the indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing to establish additional and reasonable requirements pertaining to health and safety protocols.(b) If the parties are unable to come to an agreement under (a) of this subsection (7) within 180 days of the permit being submitted, the county or city may deny the permit. If a permit is denied under this subsection, the county or city must assist the sponsor in identifying suitable properties to site the indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing.(c) This subsection (7) does not apply to an indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing designated for individuals under the age of 18, families, or victims of domestic violence.(d) Nothing in this subsection (7) allows a county or city to limit indoor emergency shelters or indoor emergency housing in a manner where the capacity of indoor emergency shelters and indoor emergency housing is insufficient to meet the projected needs identified under RCW 36.70A.070(2)(a)(ii).Sec. 3. RCW 35.21.683 and 2021 c 254 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) A city ((shall not prohibit transitional))must allow:(i) Transitional housing or permanent supportive housing in any zones in which residential dwelling units or hotels are allowed((. Effective September 30, 2021, a city shall not prohibit indoor)); and(ii) Indoor emergency shelters and indoor emergency housing in any zones in which hotels are allowed((, except in such cities that have adopted an ordinance authorizing indoor emergency shelters and indoor emergency housing in a majority of zones within a one-mile proximity to transit. Reasonable occupancy, spacing, and intensity of use requirements may be imposed by ordinance on permanent supportive housing, transitional housing, indoor emergency housing, and indoor emergency shelters to protect public health and safety. Any such requirements on occupancy, spacing, and intensity of use may not prevent the siting of a sufficient number of permanent supportive housing, transitional housing, indoor emergency housing, or indoor emergency shelters necessary to accommodate each city's projected need for such housing and shelter under RCW 36.70A.070(2)(a)(ii))). Nothing in this subsection allows a county or city to limit indoor emergency shelters and indoor emergency housing in a manner where the capacity of indoor emergency shelters and indoor emergency housing is insufficient to meet the projected needs identified under RCW 36.70A.070(2)(a)(ii). A county or city must allow indoor emergency shelters and indoor emergency housing in additional types of zones when necessary to meet projected needs identified in RCW 36.70A.070(2)(a)(ii).(b) A city may not require transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, indoor emergency housing, and indoor emergency shelters to be located in a zone within an area zoned for industrial use.(2) Except as provided in subsections (5) through (7) of this section, a city may not require through development regulations, ordinances, or legal agreements any development or operating standards, conditions, or requirements for transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, indoor emergency housing, and indoor emergency shelters that are more restrictive than those required for other types of lodging or residential development within the same zone, but may apply any objective development regulations, including form-based codes, that are required for lodging or residential development including, but not limited to, density limits, dimensional standards, height restrictions, floor area ratio, setback, lot coverage, stormwater, clearing, and tree canopy and retention requirements.(3) Except as provided in subsections (5) through (7) of this section, a county or city shall only apply the same development permit and environmental review processes to transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, indoor emergency shelters, and indoor emergency housing that apply to other types of lodging or residential development within the same zone, unless otherwise required by state law including, but not limited to, shoreline regulations under chapter 90.58 RCW, building codes under chapter 19.27 RCW, energy codes under chapter 19.27A RCW, or electrical codes under chapter 19.28 RCW.(4) If applying design review for transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, indoor emergency shelters, and indoor emergency housing, only administrative design review may be required. For the purposes of this subsection, "administrative design review" means a development permit process whereby an application is reviewed, approved, or denied by the planning director or the planning director's designee based solely on objective design and development standards without a public predecision hearing, unless such review is otherwise required by state or federal law, or the structure is a designated landmark or within a historic district established under a local preservation ordinance. A city may approve requests for variances from locally established design review standards.(5)(a) For an indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing, a city may require the sponsor or managing agency to certify in writing that it has, between the date the permit application was approved and the date the certificate of occupancy was issued:(i) Provided the name, if any, of the facility and the name and headquarters address of the managing entity;(ii) Provided a description of any other programs operating in the building and copies of the applicable licenses and certifications held by the program;(iii) Notified residents within 500 feet of the indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing;(iv) Conducted more than one community meeting;(v) Designated at least one point of contact authorized to make decisions and take corrective action in the case of an emergency, and provided at least one telephone number to be used in emergencies; and(vi) Provided documentation of the sponsor's or managing agency's operational policies or procedures for:(A) Promoting and addressing health and safety inside the building and in areas immediately adjacent to the building;(B) Admissions, including a description of the populations the project will serve and potential sources of referral;(C) Program exit or transfer;(D) Handling complaints and grievances from occupants;(E) Health, fire, safety, and occupancy; and(F) Staffing to provide services and resources to the population being served comparable to standard or customary practices for the particular type of housing being provided. The staffing policy or procedure may include, but is not limited to, the number of staff or volunteers present during daytime and nighttime operations, staff or volunteer training, and other processes to provide services and resources to the populations being served.(b) The written certification by the sponsor or managing entity constitutes full compliance with (a) of this subsection (5). A city may not require the sponsor or managing agency to provide additional certifications outside of what is allowed under (a) of this subsection (5) or to repeat or revise any of the items in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection (5). Nothing in this subsection (b) prohibits the sponsor or managing agency from voluntarily updating any of the information submitted under (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection (5).(6) Nothing in this section requires a city to approve a permit application for permanent supportive housing, transitional housing, indoor emergency housing, or indoor emergency shelters that are proposed in a critical area in which no lodging or residential development is permitted, an area of natural hazards that generally prohibit lodging or residential development, or on agricultural, forest, or mineral lands of long-term commercial significance.(7)(a) Upon receipt of a permit application for an indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing with a proposed location within 500 feet of walking distance from another indoor emergency shelter or other indoor emergency housing, or within 500 feet of walking distance from the physical grounds of a public school as defined in RCW 28A.150.010 or a private school approved by the board of education under chapter 28A.195 RCW that existed before an indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing is in operation or has submitted a permit application, a city may enter into good faith negotiations with the sponsor of the indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing to establish additional and reasonable requirements pertaining to health and safety protocols.(b) If the parties are unable to come to an agreement under (a) of this subsection (7) within 180 days of the permit being submitted, the city may deny the permit. If a permit is denied under this subsection, the city must assist the sponsor in identifying suitable properties to site the indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing.(c) This subsection (7) does not apply to an indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing designated for individuals under the age of 18, families, or victims of domestic violence.(d) Nothing in this subsection (7) allows a city to limit indoor emergency shelters or indoor emergency housing in a manner where the capacity of indoor emergency shelters and indoor emergency housing is insufficient to meet the projected needs identified under RCW 36.70A.070(2)(a)(ii).(8) For purposes of this section, "emergency housing," "emergency shelter," "permanent supportive housing," and "transitional housing" have the same meaning as in RCW 36.70A.030.Sec. 4. RCW 35A.21.430 and 2021 c 254 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) A code city ((shall not prohibit transitional))must allow:(i) Transitional housing or permanent supportive housing in any zones in which residential dwelling units or hotels are allowed((. Effective September 30, 2021, a code city shall not prohibit indoor)); and(ii) Indoor emergency shelters and indoor emergency housing in any zones in which hotels are allowed((, except in such cities that have adopted an ordinance authorizing indoor emergency shelters and indoor emergency housing in a majority of zones within a one-mile proximity to transit. Reasonable occupancy, spacing, and intensity of use requirements may be imposed by ordinance on permanent supportive housing, transitional housing, indoor emergency housing, and indoor emergency shelters to protect public health and safety. Any such requirements on occupancy, spacing, and intensity of use may not prevent the siting of a sufficient number of permanent supportive housing, transitional housing, indoor emergency housing, or indoor emergency shelters necessary to accommodate each code city's projected need for such housing and shelter under RCW 36.70A.070(2)(a)(ii))). Nothing in this subsection allows a county or city to limit indoor emergency shelters and indoor emergency housing in a manner where the capacity of indoor emergency shelters and indoor emergency housing is insufficient to meet the projected needs identified under RCW 36.70A.070(2)(a)(ii). A county or city must allow indoor emergency shelters and indoor emergency housing in additional types of zones when necessary to meet projected needs identified in RCW 36.70A.070(2)(a)(ii).(b) A code city may not require transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, indoor emergency housing, and indoor emergency shelters to be located in a zone within an area zoned for industrial use.(2) Except as provided in subsections (5) through (7) of this section, a code city may not require through development regulations, ordinances, or legal agreements any development or operating standards, conditions, or requirements for transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, indoor emergency housing, and indoor emergency shelters that are more restrictive than those required for other types of lodging or residential development within the same zone, but may apply any objective development regulations, including form-based codes, that are required for lodging or residential development including, but not limited to, density limits, dimensional standards, height restrictions, floor area ratio, setback, lot coverage, stormwater, clearing, and tree canopy and retention requirements.(3) Except as provided in subsections (5) through (7) of this section, a code city shall only apply the same development permit and environmental review processes to transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, indoor emergency shelters, and indoor emergency housing that apply to other types of lodging or residential development within the same zone, unless otherwise required by state law including, but not limited to, shoreline regulations under chapter 90.58 RCW, building codes under chapter 19.27 RCW, energy codes under chapter 19.27A RCW, or electrical codes under chapter 19.28 RCW.(4) If applying design review for transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, indoor emergency shelters, and indoor emergency housing, only administrative design review may be required. For the purposes of this subsection, "administrative design review" means a development permit process whereby an application is reviewed, approved, or denied by the planning director or the planning director's designee based solely on objective design and development standards without a public predecision hearing, unless such review is otherwise required by state or federal law, or the structure is a designated landmark or within a historic district established under a local preservation ordinance. A city may approve requests for variances from locally established design review standards.(5)(a) For an indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing, a code city may require the sponsor or managing agency to certify in writing that it has, between the date the permit application was approved and the date the certificate of occupancy was issued:(i) Provided the name, if any, of the facility and the name and headquarters address of the managing entity;(ii) Provided a description of any other programs operating in the building and copies of the applicable licenses and certifications held by the program;(iii) Notified residents within 500 feet of the indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing;(iv) Conducted more than one community meeting;(v) Designated at least one point of contact authorized to make decisions and take corrective action in the case of an emergency, and provided at least one telephone number to be used in emergencies; and(vi) Provided documentation of the sponsor's or managing agency's operational policies or procedures for:(A) Promoting and addressing health and safety inside the building and in areas immediately adjacent to the building;(B) Admissions, including a description of the populations the project will serve and potential sources of referral;(C) Program exit or transfer;(D) Handling complaints and grievances from occupants;(E) Health, fire, safety, and occupancy; and(F) Staffing to provide services and resources to the population being served comparable to standard or customary practices for the particular type of housing being provided. The staffing policy or procedure may include, but is not limited to, the number of staff or volunteers present during daytime and nighttime operations, staff or volunteer training, and other processes to provide services and resources to the populations being served.(b) The written certification by the sponsor or managing entity constitutes full compliance with (a) of this subsection (5). A code city may not require the sponsor or managing agency to provide additional certifications outside of what is allowed under (a) of this subsection (5) or to repeat or revise any of the items in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection (5). Nothing in this subsection (b) prohibits the sponsor or managing agency from voluntarily updating any of the information submitted under (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection (5).(6) Nothing in this section requires a city to approve a permit application for permanent supportive housing, transitional housing, indoor emergency housing, or indoor emergency shelters that are proposed in a critical area in which no lodging or residential development is permitted, an area of natural hazards that generally prohibit lodging or residential development, or on agricultural, forest, or mineral lands of long-term commercial significance.(7)(a) Upon receipt of a permit application for an indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing with a proposed location within 500 feet of walking distance from another indoor emergency shelter or other indoor emergency housing, or within 500 feet of walking distance from the physical grounds of a public school as defined in RCW 28A.150.010 or a private school approved by the board of education under chapter 28A.195 RCW that existed before an indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing is in operation or has submitted a permit application, a code city may enter into good faith negotiations with the sponsor of the indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing to establish additional and reasonable requirements pertaining to health and safety protocols.(b) If the parties are unable to come to an agreement under (a) of this subsection (7) within 180 days of the permit being submitted, the code city may deny the permit. If a permit is denied under this subsection, the city must assist the sponsor in identifying suitable properties to site the indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing.(c) This subsection (7) does not apply to an indoor emergency shelter or indoor emergency housing designated for individuals under the age of 18, families, or victims of domestic violence.(d) Nothing in this subsection (7) allows a code city to limit indoor emergency shelters or indoor emergency housing in a manner where the capacity of indoor emergency shelters and indoor emergency housing is insufficient to meet the projected needs identified under RCW 36.70A.070(2)(a)(ii).(8) For purposes of this section, "emergency housing," "emergency shelter," "permanent supportive housing," and "transitional housing" have the same meaning as in RCW 36.70A.030.Sec. 5. RCW 36.130.020 and 2008 c 118 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A city, county, or other local governmental entity or agency may not adopt, impose, or enforce requirements on an affordable housing development that are different than the requirements imposed on housing developments generally.(2) This section does not prohibit any city, county, or other local governmental entity or agency from extending preferential treatment to affordable housing developments intended for including, but not limited to, occupancy by homeless persons, farmworkers, persons with disabilities, senior citizens, or low-income households. Preferential treatment may include, but is not limited to: A reduction or waiver of fees or changes in applicable requirements including, without limitation, architectural requirements, site development requirements, property line requirements, building setback requirements, or vehicle parking requirements; or other treatment that reduces or is likely to reduce the development or operating costs of an affordable housing development.(3) A city, county, or other local governmental entity or agency may impose and enforce income qualification, coordinated entry, reporting, and monitoring requirements on affordable housing developments as conditions of loans, grants, financial support, tax benefits, subsidy funds, or sale or lease of public property, or as conditions to eligibility for any affordable housing incentive program under RCW 36.70A.540 or any other program involving bonus density, transfer of development rights, waiver of development regulations or fees, or other development incentives.(4)(a) A county or city may enter into a contract with a sponsor proposing transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, an indoor emergency shelter, or indoor emergency housing to establish additional and reasonable operational requirements pertaining to health and safety protocols.(b) Legal consideration for a contract entered into under this subsection (4) on the part of the county or city must, at a minimum, include:(i) A donation of real property or a long-term lease of land at least 50 years in length, to be used for the transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, indoor emergency shelter, or indoor emergency housing; or(ii) A significant contribution from the general fund for capital or operating expenses to be mutually determined by both parties.(c) A county or city that unilaterally withdraws from or modifies the consideration specified in (b) of this subsection (4) is in material breach of the contract and the operational requirements specified in the contract no longer apply to the transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, indoor emergency shelter, or indoor emergency housing.(d) A county or city may not construe a sponsor's refusal to accept contract terms pertaining to the consideration specified in (b) of this subsection (4) as a failure to meet any of the requirements of other fund sources available for the capital or operational support, or of those otherwise allowed in RCW 35.21.683 or 35A.21.430 or section 2 of this act.(e) Nothing in this subsection (4) requires a county or city to enter into a contract under this subsection (4).(f) For purposes of this subsection (4), "emergency housing," "emergency shelter," "permanent supportive housing," and "transitional housing" have the same meanings as in RCW 36.70A.030.Sec. 6. RCW 36.70A.030 and 2025 c 267 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Active transportation" means forms of pedestrian mobility including walking or running, the use of a mobility assistive device such as a wheelchair, bicycling and cycling irrespective of the number of wheels, and the use of small personal devices such as foot scooters or skateboards. Active transportation includes both traditional and electric assist bicycles and other devices. Planning for active transportation must consider and address accommodation pursuant to the Americans with disabilities act and the distinct needs of each form of active transportation.(2) "Active transportation facilities" means facilities provided for the safety and mobility of active transportation users including, but not limited to, trails, as defined in RCW 47.30.005, sidewalks, bike lanes, shared-use paths, and other facilities in the public right-of-way.(3) "Administrative design review" means a development permit process whereby an application is reviewed, approved, or denied by the planning director or the planning director's designee based solely on objective design and development standards without a public predecision hearing, unless such review is otherwise required by state or federal law, or the structure is a designated landmark or historic district established under a local preservation ordinance. A city may utilize public meetings, hearings, or voluntary review boards to consider, recommend, or approve requests for variances from locally established design review standards.(4) "Adopt a comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new comprehensive land use plan or to update an existing comprehensive land use plan.(5) "Affordable housing" means, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, residential housing whose monthly costs, including utilities other than telephone, do not exceed 30 percent of the monthly income of a household whose income is:(a) For rental housing, 60 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development; or(b) For owner-occupied housing, 80 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(6) "Agricultural land" means land primarily devoted to the commercial production of horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, dairy, apiary, vegetable, or animal products or of berries, grain, hay, straw, turf, seed, Christmas trees not subject to the excise tax imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, finfish in upland hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term commercial significance for agricultural production.(7) "Bus station area" means all lots that are:(a) Fully within an urban growth area; and(b) Fully or partially within one-quarter mile walking distance of a stop on a fixed route bus system that is designated as a bus rapid transit stop in the transit development plan as required in RCW 35.58.2795, for which an environmental determination has been issued as required under chapter 43.21C RCW, and that features fixed transit assets that indicate permanent, high capacity service including, but not limited to, elevated platforms or enhanced stations, off-board fare collection, dedicated lanes, busways, or transit signal priority.(8) "City" means any city or town, including a code city.(9) "Comprehensive land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or "plan" means a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of the governing body of a county or city that is adopted pursuant to this chapter.(10) "Cottage housing" means residential units on a lot with a common open space that either: (a) Is owned in common; or (b) has units owned as condominium units with property owned in common and a minimum of 20 percent of the lot size as open space.(11) "Courtyard apartments" means attached dwelling units arranged on two or three sides of a yard or court.(12) "Critical areas" include the following areas and ecosystems: (a) Wetlands; (b) areas with a critical recharging effect on aquifers used for potable water; (c) fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas; (d) frequently flooded areas; and (e) geologically hazardous areas. "Fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas" does not include such artificial features or constructs as irrigation delivery systems, irrigation infrastructure, irrigation canals, or drainage ditches that lie within the boundaries of and are maintained by a port district or an irrigation district or company.(13) "Department" means the department of commerce.(14) "Development regulations" or "regulation" means the controls placed on development or land use activities by a county or city, including, but not limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas ordinances, shoreline master programs, official controls, planned unit development ordinances, subdivision ordinances, and binding site plan ordinances together with any amendments thereto. A development regulation does not include a decision to approve a project permit application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020, even though the decision may be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the legislative body of the county or city.(15) "Emergency housing" means temporary indoor accommodations for individuals or families who are homeless or at imminent risk of becoming homeless that is intended to address the basic health, food, clothing, and personal hygiene needs of individuals or families. Emergency housing may or may not require occupants to enter into a lease or an occupancy agreement.(16) "Emergency shelter" means a facility that provides a temporary shelter for individuals or families who are currently homeless. Emergency shelter may not require occupants to enter into a lease or an occupancy agreement. Emergency shelter facilities may include day and warming centers that do not provide overnight accommodations.(17) "Environmental justice" means the fair treatment and meaningful involvement of all people regardless of race, color, national origin, or income with respect to development, implementation, and enforcement of environmental laws, regulations, and policies. Environmental justice includes addressing disproportionate environmental and health impacts in all laws, rules, and policies with environmental impacts by prioritizing vulnerable populations and overburdened communities and the equitable distribution of resources and benefits.(18) "Extremely low-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is at or below 30 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(19) "Floor area ratio" means a measure of development intensity equal to building square footage divided by the developable property square footage. Developable property excludes public facilities and portions of lots with critical areas and critical area buffers as designated in RCW 36.70A.060, except for critical aquifer recharge areas where a single-family detached house is an allowed use provided that any requirements to maintain aquifer recharge are met.(20) "Forestland" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for long-term commercial timber production on land that can be economically and practically managed for such production, including Christmas trees subject to the excise tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, and that has long-term commercial significance. In determining whether forestland is primarily devoted to growing trees for long-term commercial timber production on land that can be economically and practically managed for such production, the following factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to urban, suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for timber production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and services conducive to conversion of forestland to other uses.(21) "Freight rail dependent uses" means buildings and other infrastructure that are used in the fabrication, processing, storage, and transport of goods where the use is dependent on and makes use of an adjacent short line railroad. Such facilities are both urban and rural development for purposes of this chapter. "Freight rail dependent uses" does not include buildings and other infrastructure that are used in the fabrication, processing, storage, and transport of coal, liquefied natural gas, or "crude oil" as defined in RCW 90.56.010.(22) "Geologically hazardous areas" means areas that because of their susceptibility to erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other geological events, are not suited to the siting of commercial, residential, or industrial development consistent with public health or safety concerns.(23) "Green infrastructure" means a wide array of natural assets and built structures within an urban growth area boundary, including parks and other areas with protected tree canopy, and management practices at multiple scales that manage wet weather and that maintain and restore natural hydrology by storing, infiltrating, evapotranspiring, and harvesting and using stormwater.(24) "Green space" means an area of land, vegetated by natural features such as grass, trees, or shrubs, within an urban context and less than one acre in size that creates public value through one or more of the following attributes:(a) Is accessible to the public;(b) Promotes physical and mental health of residents;(c) Provides relief from the urban heat island effects;(d) Promotes recreational and aesthetic values;(e) Protects streams or water supply; or(f) Preserves visual quality along highway, road, or street corridors.(25) "Long-term commercial significance" includes the growing capacity, productivity, and soil composition of the land for long-term commercial production, in consideration with the land's proximity to population areas, and the possibility of more intense uses of the land.(26) "Low-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is at or below 80 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(27) "Major transit stop" means:(a) A stop on a high capacity transportation system funded or expanded under the provisions of chapter 81.104 RCW, except for any stop that solely serves express bus service or serves express bus service and other bus services not otherwise meeting the definition of major transit stop;(b) Commuter rail stops;(c) Stops on rail or fixed guideway systems; or(d) Stops on bus rapid transit routes, including those stops that are under construction.(28) "Middle housing" means buildings that are compatible in scale, form, and character with single-family houses and contain two or more attached, stacked, or clustered homes including duplexes, triplexes, fourplexes, fiveplexes, sixplexes, townhouses, stacked flats, courtyard apartments, and cottage housing.(29) "Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic substances.(30) "Moderate-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is at or below 120 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(31) "Overburdened community" means a geographic area where vulnerable populations face combined, multiple environmental harms and health impacts, and includes, but is not limited to, highly impacted communities as defined in RCW 19.405.020.(32) "Per capita vehicle miles traveled" means the number of miles traveled using cars and light trucks in a calendar year divided by the number of residents in Washington. The calculation of this value excludes vehicle miles driven conveying freight.(33) "Permanent supportive housing" is subsidized, leased housing with no limit on length of stay that prioritizes people who need comprehensive support services to retain tenancy and utilizes admissions practices designed to use lower barriers to entry than would be typical for other subsidized or unsubsidized rental housing, especially related to rental history, criminal history, and personal behaviors. Permanent supportive housing is paired with on-site or off-site voluntary services designed to support a person living with a complex and disabling behavioral health or physical health condition who was experiencing homelessness or was at imminent risk of homelessness prior to moving into housing to retain their housing and be a successful tenant in a housing arrangement, improve the resident's health status, and connect the resident of the housing with community-based health care, treatment, or employment services. Permanent supportive housing is subject to all of the rights and responsibilities defined in chapter 59.18 RCW.(34) "Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways, sidewalks, street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic water systems, storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks and recreational facilities, and schools.(35) "Public services" include fire protection and suppression, law enforcement, public health, education, recreation, environmental protection, and other governmental services.(36) "Rail station area" means all lots fully within an urban growth area that are:(a) Fully or partially within one-half mile walking distance of an entrance to a train station with a stop on a light rail system, a commuter rail stop in a city with a population greater than 15,000, or a stop on a rail trolley operated west of the crest of the Cascade mountains; or(b) Fully or partially within one-quarter mile walking distance of an entrance to a train station with a commuter rail stop in a city with a population no greater than 15,000.(37) "Recreational land" means land so designated under RCW 36.70A.1701 and that, immediately prior to this designation, was designated as agricultural land of long-term commercial significance under RCW 36.70A.170. Recreational land must have playing fields and supporting facilities existing before July 1, 2004, for sports played on grass playing fields.(38) "Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use and development established by a county in the rural element of its comprehensive plan:(a) In which open space, the natural landscape, and vegetation predominate over the built environment;(b) That foster traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based economies, and opportunities to both live and work in rural areas;(c) That provide visual landscapes that are traditionally found in rural areas and communities;(d) That are compatible with the use of the land by wildlife and for fish and wildlife habitat;(e) That reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling, low-density development;(f) That generally do not require the extension of urban governmental services; and(g) That are consistent with the protection of natural surface water flows and groundwater and surface water recharge and discharge areas.(39) "Rural development" refers to development outside the urban growth area and outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can consist of a variety of uses and residential densities, including clustered residential development, at levels that are consistent with the preservation of rural character and the requirements of the rural element. Rural development does not refer to agriculture or forestry activities that may be conducted in rural areas.(40) "Rural governmental services" or "rural services" include those public services and public facilities historically and typically delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and may include domestic water systems and fire and police protection services associated with rural development and normally not associated with urban areas. Rural services do not include storm or sanitary sewers, except as otherwise authorized by RCW 36.70A.110(4).(41) "Short line railroad" means those railroad lines designated class II or class III by the United States surface transportation board.(42) "Single-family zones" means those zones where single-family detached housing is the predominant land use.(43) "Stacked flat" means dwelling units in a residential building of no more than three stories on a residential zoned lot in which each floor may be separately rented or owned.(44) "Station area" means a bus station area or a rail station area.(45) "Townhouses" means buildings that contain three or more attached single-family dwelling units that extend from foundation to roof and that have a yard or public way on not less than two sides.(46) "Transitional housing" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.36.043.(47) "Transportation system" means all infrastructure and services for all forms of transportation within a geographical area, irrespective of the responsible jurisdiction or transportation provider.(((47)))(48) "Urban governmental services" or "urban services" include those public services and public facilities at an intensity historically and typically provided in cities, specifically including storm and sanitary sewer systems, domestic water systems, street cleaning services, fire and police protection services, public transit services, and other public utilities associated with urban areas and normally not associated with rural areas.(((48)))(49) "Urban growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use of land for the location of buildings, structures, and impermeable surfaces to such a degree as to be incompatible with the primary use of land for the production of food, other agricultural products, or fiber, or the extraction of mineral resources, rural uses, rural development, and natural resource lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. A pattern of more intensive rural development, as provided in RCW 36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread over wide areas, urban growth typically requires urban governmental services. "Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban growth located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area with urban growth on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.(((49)))(50) "Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by a county pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.(((50)))(51) "Very low-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is at or below 50 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(((51)))(52)(a) "Vulnerable populations" means population groups that are more likely to be at higher risk for poor health outcomes in response to environmental harms, due to: (i) Adverse socioeconomic factors, such as unemployment, high housing and transportation costs relative to income, limited access to nutritious food and adequate health care, linguistic isolation, and other factors that negatively affect health outcomes and increase vulnerability to the effects of environmental harms; and (ii) sensitivity factors, such as low birth weight and higher rates of hospitalization.(b) "Vulnerable populations" includes, but is not limited to:(i) Racial or ethnic minorities;(ii) Low-income populations; and(iii) Populations disproportionately impacted by environmental harms.(((52)))(53) "Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are inundated or saturated by surface water or groundwater at a frequency and duration sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited to, irrigation and drainage ditches, grass-lined swales, canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment facilities, farm ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created after July 1, 1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the construction of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to mitigate conversion of wetlands.(((53)))(54) "Wildland urban interface" means the geographical area where structures and other human development meets or intermingles with wildland vegetative fuels.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. (1) A county or city subject to this act shall adopt or amend by ordinance, and incorporate into its development regulations, zoning regulations, and other official controls, the requirements of this act within two years of the effective date of this section or its next comprehensive plan update, whichever occurs first. The requirements of this act supersede, preempt, and invalidate any conflicting local regulations and apply regardless of whether a county or city has incorporated the requirements of this act into the county's or city's development regulations, zoning regulations, and other official controls.(2) This act does not apply to transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, indoor emergency shelters, and indoor emergency housing in operation on the effective date of this section. A county or city may not deem transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, indoor emergency shelters, and indoor emergency housing in operation on the effective date of this section unlawful or noncompliant due to the provisions of the act or due to ordinances, regulations, or controls adopted or amended under subsection (1) of this section.--- END ---